Florida, session 2026, HB443.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 487.082, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
487.082 Products liability actions.—A products liability
action under this part based on a failure to warn may not be
brought or maintained with respect to any pesticide registered
with the United States Environmental Protection Agency under the
Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA), 7
U.S.C. ss. 136 et seq., if the label for such pesticide is:
(1) Approved by the United States Environmental Protection
Agency;
(2) Consistent with the most recent human health risk
assessment performed under FIFRA; or
(3) Consistent with the United States Environmental
Protection Agency's carcinogenicity classification of the
pesticide under FIFRA.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb443-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 443 2026

However, this section does not shield from liability a
manufacturer that the United States Environmental Protection
Agency determines knowingly withheld, concealed, misrepresented,
or destroyed material information regarding the human health
risks or carcinogenicity of a pesticide in order to obtain or
maintain approval of the label for the pesticide by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb443-00